Washington statutes.
RCW 43.168.060

Local development organizations—Duties of department—Rules.

The department is encouraged to work with local development organizations to promote applications for loans by the fund. The department shall also provide assistance to local development organizations and local governments to identify viable projects for consideration. The department shall adopt such rules and regulations as are appropriate for implementation of this chapter.

[ 2005 c 136 s 6; 1985 c 164 s 6.]

NOTES:

Savings—Effective date—2005 c 136: See notes following RCW 43.168.020.